en: Vitamin K3
xx: vitamin K3, vitamin K₃, K₃ vitamin, K3 vitamin, 3a710
bg: Витамин K3
de: Vitamin K3
el: Βιταμίνη K3
es: Vitamina K3
et: Vitamiin K3
fi: K3-vitamiini
fr: Vitamine K3, ménadione
ga: Vitimín K3
he: ויטמין K3, מנדיון
hu: K3-vitamin
it: Vitamina K3
ja: ビタミンK3, ビタミンＫ３, ビタミン K3, ビタミン Ｋ３, V.K3, Ｖ．Ｋ３, V.K₃, V-K3, ＶーＫ３, V-K₃
lt: Vitaminas K3
lv: K3 vitamīns
mt: Vitamina K3
nl: Vitamine K3
pl: Witamina K3
pt: Vitamina K3
ro: Vitamina K3
sk: Vitamín K3
zh: 维生素K3

en: Vitamin C
xx: vitamin C, C vitamin, 3a312
af: Vitamien C
az: C vitamini
bg: Витамин C
bn: ভিটামিন সি
bs: Vitamin C
ca: vitamina C
cs: vitamín C
cy: Fitamin C
da: C-vitamin
de: Vitamin C
dv: ވިޓަމިން ސީ
el: Βιταμίνη C
eo: Vitamino C
es: vitamina C
et: C-vitamiin
eu: C bitamina
fa: ویتامین ث
fi: C-vitamiini
fr: vitamine C, antioxydant e300
gl: Vitamina C
he: ויטמין C
hi: विटामिन सी
hr: vitamin C
hu: C-vitamin
hy: Վիտամին C
id: Vitamin C
is: C-vítamín
it: vitamina C
ja: ビタミンC, ビタミンＣ, ビタミン C, ビタミン Ｃ, V.C, Ｖ．Ｃ, V-C, ＶーＣ
jv: Vitamin C
ka: vitamine c
kn: C ಜೀವ ಸತ್ವ
ko: 비타민 C, 비타민C
ky: Витамин С
lt: Vitaminas C
lv: C vitamīns
mk: Витамин Ц
ml: ജീവകം സി
mr: क-जीवनसत्त्व
ms: Vitamin C
nb: Vitamin C
ne: भिटामिन सी
nl: Vitamine C
oc: Vitamina C
or: ଜୀବସାର ଗ
pa: ਵਿਟਾਮਿਨ ਸੀ
pl: witamina C
pt: vitamina C
ro: Vitamina C
ru: витамин c
rw: Vitamini C
sh: Vitamin C
sl: Vitamin C
sq: Vitamina C
sr: витамин Ц
su: Vitamin C
sv: vitamin C, C-vitamin
sw: Vitamini C
ta: உயிர்ச்சத்து சி
te: విటమిన్ సి
th: วิตามินซี
tl: Bitamina C
tr: C vitamini
ug: ۋىتامىن C
uk: Вітамін C
ur: حیاتین ج
vi: Vitamin C
yi: וויטאמין C
zh: 维生素C, 维生素 C

en: L-ascorbic acid, ascorbic acid
bg: L-аскорбинова киселина, аскорбинова киселина
bs: Askorbinska kiselina
ca: àcid ascòrbic
cs: L-askorbová kyselina, askorbová kyselina
de: L-Ascorbinsäure, Ascorbinsäure
el: L-ασκορβικό οξύ, ασκορβικό οξύ
es: Ácido L-ascórbico, Ácido ascórbico
et: L-askorbiinhape, askorbiinhape
fi: L-askorbiinihappo, askorbiinihappo
fr: acide L-ascorbique, acide ascorbique
gl: Ácido ascórbico
hr: L-askorbinska kiselina, askorbinska kiselina
hu: L-aszkorbinsav, aszkorbinsav
it: acido L-Ascorbico, acido Ascorbico
ja: L-アスコルビン酸, アスコルビン酸
lt: L–askorbo rūgštis, askorbo rūgštis
lv: L-askorbīnskābe, askorbīnskābe
mt: L-aċidu askorbiku, aċidu askorbiku
nl: L-ascorbinezuur, ascorbinezuur
pl: kwas L-askorbinowy, kwas askorbinowy
pt: Ácido L-ascórbico, Ácido ascórbico
ro: acid L-ascorbic, acid ascorbic
ru: Аскорбиновая кислота
sk: kyselina L-askorbová, kyselina askorbová
sl: L-askorbinska kislina, askorbinska kislina
sv: L-askorbinsyra, askorbinsyra
tr: askorbik asit
zh: 抗坏血酸

en: sodium-L-ascorbate, fscorbate
bg: Натриев-L-аскорбат
cs: L-askorbát sodný
de: Natrium-L-ascorbat
el: L-ασκορβικό νάτριο
es: L-ascorbato sódico
et: naatrium-L-askorbaat
fi: natrium-L-askorbaatti
fr: L-ascorbate de sodium, ascorbate de sodium
hu: nátrium-L-aszkorbát
it: L-ascorbato di sodio
lt: natrio L-askorbatas
lv: nātrija L-askorbāts
mt: L-assorbat tas-sodju
nl: natrium-L-ascorbaat
pl: L-askorbinian sodu
pt: L-ascorbato de sódio
ro: L-ascorbat de sodiu
sk: L-askorban sodný
sl: natrijev-L-askorbat
sv: natrium-L-askorbat

en: calcium-L-ascorbate, calcium ascorbate
bg: Калциев-L-аскорбат
cs: L-askorbát vápenatý
de: Calcium-L-ascorbat
el: L-ασκορβικό ασβέστιο
es: L-ascorbato cálcico
et: kaltsium-L-askorbaat
fi: kalsium-L-askorbaatti
fr: L-ascorbate de calcium, ascorbate de calcium
hu: kalcium-L-aszkorbát
it: L-ascorbato di calcio
lt: kalcio L-askorbatas
lv: kalcija L-askorbāts
mt: L-assorbat tal-kalċju
nl: calcium-L-ascorbaat
pl: L-askorbinian wapnia
pt: L-ascorbato de cálcio
ro: L-ascorbat de calciu
sk: L-askorban vápenatý
sl: kalcijev-L-askorbat
sv: kalcium-L-askorbat

en: potassium-L-ascorbate, potassium ascorbate
bg: Калиев-L-аскорбат
cs: L-askorbát draselný
de: Kalium-L-ascorbat
el: L-ασκορβικό κάλιο
es: L-ascorbato potásico
et: kaalium-L-askorbaat
fi: kalium-L-askorbaatti
fr: L-ascorbate de potassium, ascorbate de potassium
hu: kálium-L-aszkorbát
it: L-ascorbato di potassio
lt: kalio L-askorbatas
lv: kālija L-askorbāts
mt: L-assorbat tal-potassju
nl: kalium-L-ascorbaat
pl: L-askorbinian potasu
pt: L-ascorbato de potássio
ro: L-ascorbat de potasiu
sk: L-askorban draselný
sl: kalijev-L-askorbat
sv: kalium-L-askorbat

en: L-ascorbyl 6-palmitate
bg: L-аскорбил 6-палмитат
cs: L-askorbyl-6-palmitát
de: L-Ascorbyl-6-palmitat
el: αλμιτικό L-ασκορβύλιο
es: almitato de L-ascorbilo
et: L-askorbüül-6-palmitaat
fi: L-askorbyyli-6-palmitaatti
fr: L-ascorbyle 6-palmitate
hu: L-aszkorbil-6-palmitát
it: almitato di L-ascorbile
lt: L-askorbil- 6-palmitatas
lv: L-askorbil-6-palmitāts
mt: L-assorbil 6-palmitat
nl: almityl-L-ascorbinezuur
pl: almitynian-L-askorbylu
pt: almitato de L-ascorbilo
ro: L-ascorbil 6-palmitat
sk: L-askorbyl-6-palmitát
sl: L-askorbil 6-palmitat
sv: L-askorbyl-6-palmitat

en: thiamin, thiamine
xx: vitamin B1, vitamin B₁, B₁ vitamin, B1 vitamin, B₁, B1
af: Tiamien
ar: فيتامين ب1
az: Tiamin, B1 vitamini
be: Тыямін
bg: Тиамин, Витамин B1
bn: থায়ামিন
bs: Vitamin B1
ca: tiamina, Vitamina B1
cs: thiamin, vitamin B1
cy: Thiamin, Fitamin B1
da: Tiamin, Vitamin B1
de: Thiamin, Vitamin B1
dv: ވިޓަމިން ބީ1
el: θιαμίνη, βιταμίνη Β1
eo: Tiamino, Vitamino B1
es: tiamina, vitamina b1
et: Tiamiin, Vitamiin B1
eu: Tiamina, B1 bitamina
fa: ویتامین ب۱
fi: Tiamiini, Tiamiinia, B1-vitamiini
fo: Thiamin, Vitamin B1
fr: thiamine, vitamines b1, Vitamine B1
ga: Tiaimín
gl: Tiamina, Vitamina B1
he: ויטמין B1
hi: विटामिन बी१
hr: Tiamin, vitamin B1, B1
hu: Tiamin, B1-vitamin
hy: Թիամին, Վիտամին B1
id: Tiamina, Vitamin B1
is: Þíamín, B1-vítamín
it: tiamina, vitamina B1
ja: チアミン, ビタミンB1, ビタミンＢ１, ビタミン B1, ビタミン Ｂ１, V.B1, Ｖ．Ｂ１, V.B₁, V-B1, ＶーＢ１, V-B₁
ko: 티아민, 바이타민 B1
ky: Витамин В1
lb: Thiamin, Vitamin B1
lt: Tiaminas
lv: Tiamīns, B1 vitamīns
mk: Витамин Б1
ml: തയാമിൻ
ms: Tiamina, Vitamin B1
mt: Tiamina
nb: Tiamin
ne: भिटामिन बी-१
nl: thiamine, vitamine B1
nn: tiamin, vitamin B1
oc: Tiamina, Vitamina B1
or: ଥାୟାମିନ, ଜୀବସାର ଖ୧
pl: tiamina, witamina B1
pt: tiamina, vitamina B1
ro: Tiamină, Vitamina B1
ru: тиамин, Витамин B1
rw: Vitamini B1
sh: Tiamin, Vitamin B1
sk: Tiamín, Vitamín B1
sl: Tiamin, vitamin B1
sq: Tiamina, Vitamina B1
sr: vitamin B1
su: Tiamin
sv: tiamin, vitamin B1
sw: Tiamin, B1-vitamin
ta: தயமின்
tg: Тиамин
th: ไทอามีน, วิตามินบี1
tr: Tiyamin, B1 vitamini
uk: Тіамін, Вітамін B1
vi: Thiamin
wa: Tiyamene
zh: 硫胺, 維他命B1

en: thiamin hydrochloride
bg: Тиамин хидрохлорид
cs: thiamin-hydrochlorid
de: Thiaminhydrochlorid
el: υδροχλωρική θειαμίνη
es: clorhidrato de tiamina
et: tiamiinhüdrokloriid
fi: tiamiinihydrokloridi
fr: chlorhydrate de thiamine
hr: tiamin-hidroklorid
hu: tiamin-hidroklorid
it: cloridrato di tiamina
lt: tiamino hidrochloridas
lv: tiamīna hidrohlorīds
mt: idroklorur tat-tijamina
nl: thiaminehydrochloride
pl: chlorowodorek tiaminy
pt: cloridrato de tiamina
ro: clorhidrat de tiamină
sk: tiamínhydrochlorid
sl: tiamin hidroklorid
sr: tiamin-hidrohlorid
sv: tiaminhydroklorid

en: thiamin mononitrate, thiamine mononitrate
xx: 3a821
bg: Тиамин мононитрат
ca: mononitrat de tiamina
cs: thiamin-mononitrát
da: thiamin-mononitrat
de: Thiaminmononitrat
el: μονονιτρική θειαμίνη
es: mononitrato de tiamina
et: tiamiinmononitraat
fi: tiamiinimononitraatti
fr: mononitrate de thiamine
hr: tiamin mononitrat, tiaminmononitrat
hu: tiamin-mononitrát
it: mononitrato di tiamina
lt: tiamino mononitratas
lv: tiamīna mononitrāts
mt: mononitrat tat-tijamina
nl: thiaminemononitraat
pl: monoazotan tiaminy
pt: mononitrato de tiamina
ro: mononitrat de tiamină
sk: tiamínmononitrát
sl: tiamin mononitrat
sv: tiaminmononitrat

en: riboflavin, vitamin B2
xx: riboflavin, vitamin B2, vitamin B₂, B₂ vitamin, B2 vitamin, E101, B2, B₂
af: Riboflavien
ar: ﻒﻴﺗﺎﻤﻴﻧ ﺏ2
be: Рыбафлавін
bg: Рибофлавин, Витамин B2
bn: রিবোফ্লেবিন
bs: vitamin B2
ca: riboflavina, vitamina B2
cs: riboflavin, vitamín B2
cy: ribofflafin, fitamin B2
de: Riboflavin, Riboflavine, Vitamin B2
dv: ވިޓަމިން ބީ2
el: ριβοφλαβίνη, βιταμίνη Β2
eo: riboflavino, vitamino B2
es: riboflavina, vitamina B2
et: riboflaviin, vitamiin B2
eu: B2 bitamina
fa: ﻮﯿﺗﺎﻤﯿﻧ ﺏ۲
fi: riboflaviini
fr: riboflavine, vitamine B2
ga: ribeaflaivin
gl: riboflavina, vitamina B2
he: ויטמין B2
hi: रिबोफ्लेविन, विटामिन बी२
hu: riboflavin, B2-vitamin
hy: Վիտամին B2
it: riboflavina, vitamina B2
ja: リボフラビン, ビタミンB2, ビタミンＢ２, ビタミン B2, ビタミン Ｂ２, V.B2, Ｖ．Ｂ２, V.B₂, V-B2, ＶーＢ２, V-B₂
kk: Рибофлавин
ko: 리보플래빈, 바이타민 B2
ky: Рибофлавин, Витамин В2
lt: riboflavinas
lv: riboflavīns, B2 vitamīns
mk: Рибофлавин
ml: റൈബോഫ്ലേവിൻ
mt: riboflavina
ne: भिटामिन बी-२
nl: riboflavine, vitamine B2
oc: riboflavina, vitamina B2
or: ରାଇବୋଫ୍ଲାଭିନ, ଜୀବସାର ଖ୨
pl: ryboflawina, ryboflawiny, witamina B2
pt: riboflavina, vitamina B2
ro: riboflavină, vitamina B2
ru: рибофлавин, Витамин B2
rw: vitamini B2
sh: Vitamin B2
sk: Riboflavín, Vitamín B2
ta: ரிபோஃபிளாவின்
th: ไรโบเฟลวิน
tr: riboflavin, B2 vitamini
uk: Рибофлавін, Вітамін B2
wa: riboflavene, vitamene B2
zh: 核黄素

en: niacin, vitamin B3, vitamin PP
xx: niacin, vitamin B3, vitamin B₃, B₃ vitamin, B3 vitamin, B3, B₃, vitamin PP, PP vitamin, PP, E375
af: niasien
ar: ﻦﻳﺎﺴﻴﻧ
be: нікацінавая кіслата
bg: ниацин, витамин B3, витамин PP
bs: vitamin B3
ca: niacina, vitamina B3, vitamina PP
cs: niacin, vitamín B3, vitamín PP
cy: niacin, fitamin B3
de: Niacin, Vitamin B3
dv: ވިޓަމިން ބީ3
el: νιασίνη
eo: niacino, vitamino B3
es: niacina, vitamina B3, vitamina PP
et: niatsiin, vitamiin B3
eu: niazina, B3 bitamina
fa: ﻮﯿﺗﺎﻤﯿﻧ ﺏ۳
fi: niasiini, B3-vitamiini
fr: niacine, vitamine B3, vitamine PP
ga: aigéad nicitíneach
gl: niacina, vitamina B3
he: ויטמין B3
hi: नाइयासिन
hr: niacin, vitamin B3, nijacin
hu: niacin, B3-vitamin, PP-vitamin
hy: վիտամին B3
id: niasin, vitamin B3
it: niacina, vitamina PP
ja: ナイアシン, ビタミンB3, ビタミンPP, ビタミンＢ３, ビタミン B3, ビタミン Ｂ３, V.B3, Ｖ．Ｂ３, V.B₃, V-B3, ＶーＢ３, V-B₃
lt: niacinas
lv: niacīns
mt: niaċina
nl: niacine, vitamine B3, vitamine PP
pl: niacyna, witamina B3, witamina PP
pt: niacina
ro: niacină
ru: ниацин, витамин B3, витамин PP
sk: niacín

en: nicotinic acid
bg: никотинова киселина
cs: kyselina nikotinová
de: Nicotinsäure
el: νικοτινικό οξύ
es: ácido nicotínico
et: nikotiinhape
fi: nikotiinihappo
fr: acide nicotinique
hu: nikotinsav
it: acido nicotinico
lt: nikotino rūgštis
lv: nikotīnskābe
mt: aċidu nikotoniku
nl: nicotinezuur
pl: kwas nikotynowy
pt: ácido nicotínico
ro: acid nicotinic
ru: никотиновая кислота
sk: kyselina nikotínová
sl: nikotinska kislina
sv: nikotinsyra

en: nicotinamide, niacinamide
xx: 3a315
ar: ﻦﻴﻛﻮﺘﻴﻧﺎﻤﻳﺩ
bg: никотинамид
ca: niacinamida
cs: nikotinamid
cy: nicotinamid
de: Nicotinamid
el: νικοτιναμίδη, νικοτιναμίδιο
eo: nikotinamido
es: nicotinamida
et: nikotiinamiid
fi: nikotiiniamidi, niasiiniamidi
fr: nicotinamide, niacinamide
hi: निकोटिनामाइड
hr: nikotinamid
hu: nikotinamid
hy: Նիկոտինամիդ
id: nikotinamida
it: nicotinamide
ja: ニコチンアミド
ko: 니코틴아마이드
lt: nikotinamidas
lv: nikotīnamīds
mt: nikotinamide
nl: nicotinamide
or: ନିକୋଟିନାମାଇଡ଼
pl: nikotynoamid, nikotynamid, amid kwasu nikotynowego
pt: nicotinamida
ro: nicotinamidă
ru: Никотинамид
sh: nikotinamid
sk: nikotínamid
sl: nikotinamid
sr: никотинамид
sv: nikotinamid
tr: nikotinamid
uk: Нікотинамід
vi: nicotinamide
zh: 烟酰胺

en: vitamin B6
xx: vitamin B6, vitamin B₆, B₆ vitamin, B6 vitamin, B6, B₆, pyridoxal 5′-phosphate
ar: فيتامين بي6
az: piridoksalfosfat
bg: витамин B6
bn: পাইরিডক্সিন
ca: vitamina B6
cs: vitamín B6
de: Vitamin B6
dv: ވިޓަމިން ބީ6
el: βιταμίνη B6
eo: vitamino B6
es: vitamina B6
et: B6-vitamiin, vitamiin B6
eu: B6 bitamina
fa: ویتامین ب۶
fi: B6-vitamiini
fr: vitamine B6
fy: fitamine B6
gl: vitamina B6
gu: વિટામિન બી૬
he: B6 ויטמין
hi: विटामिन बी६
hu: B6-vitamin
hy: Վիտամին B6
it: vitamina B6
ja: ビタミンB6, ビタミンＢ６, ビタミン B6, ビタミン Ｂ６, V.B6, Ｖ．Ｂ６, V.B₆, V-B6, ＶーＢ６, V-B₆
ko: 비타민 B6
ky: витамин В6
lt: vitaminas B6
lv: B6 vitamīns
mk: витамин Б6
mn: B6 витамин
mt: vitamina B6
my: ဗီတာမင်ဘီ-၆
ne: भिटामिन बी-६
nl: vitamine B6
oc: vitamina B6
pl: witamina B6
pt: vitamina B6
ro: vitamina B6
ru: витамин B6
rw: vitamini B6
sk: vitamín B6
ta: உயிர்ச்சத்து பி6
th: วิตามินบี6
uk: вітамін B6
zh: 维生素B6

en: pyridoxine
xx: pyridoxin
ar: بيريدوكسين
bg: пиридоксин
ca: piridoxina
de: Pyridoxin
es: piridoxina
fr: pyridoxine
hu: piridoxin
it: piridoxina
nb: pyridoksin
nn: pyridoksin
pt: piridoxina
uz: piridoksin

en: pyridoxamine
xx: pyridoxamin
de: Pyridoxamin
fi: pyridoksamiini
hu: piridoxamin

en: pyridoxine hydrochloride
xx: 3a831
bg: пиридоксин хидрохлорид
cs: pyridoxin-hydrochlorid
de: Pyridoxinhydrochlorid
el: υδροχλωρική πυριδοξίνη
es: clorhidrato de piridoxina
et: püridoksiinvesinikkloriid
fi: pyridoksiinihydrokloridi
fr: chlorhydrate de pyridoxine
hr: piridoksin-hidroklorid, piridoksinhidrohlorid
hu: piridoxin-hidroklorid
it: cloridrato di piridossina
lt: piridoksino hidrochloridas
lv: piridoksīna hidrohlorīds
mt: idroklorur tal-piridossina
nl: pyridoxinehydrochloride, pyridoxine hydrochloride
pl: chlorowodorek pirydoksyny
pt: cloridrato de piridoxina
ro: clorhidrat de piridoxină
ru: пиридоксин гидрохлорид
sk: pyridoxínhydrochlorid
sl: piridoksin hidroklorid
sr: piridoksin-hidrohlorid
sv: pyridoxinhydroklorid

en: pyridoxamine hydrochloride
hu: piridoxamin-hidroklorid

en: pyridoxine 5'-phosphate
hu: pirodoxál-5-foszfát
it: piridossalfosfato, piridossal fosfato, piridossal-5'-fosfato
nl: pyridoxine-5'-fosfaat